Missouri, session 2026, HB2696.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 50.640, 50.641, 50.642, and 476.270, RSMo, are repealed and
four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 50.640, 50.641, 50.642, and
476.270, to read as follows:
[50.640. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all offices,
departments, courts, institutions, commissions or other agencies spending
moneys of the county shall perform the duties and observe the restrictions set
forth in sections 50.540 to 50.630 relating to budget procedure and
appropriations. The estimates of the circuit court, including all activities
thereof and of the circuit clerk, shall be transmitted to the budget officer by the
circuit clerk. The estimates of the circuit clerk shall bear the approval of the
circuit court. The budget officer or the county commission shall not change
the estimates of the circuit court or of the circuit clerk without the consent of
the circuit court or the circuit clerk, respectively, but shall appropriate in the
appropriation order the amounts estimated as originally submitted or as
changed, with their consent.
2. If the county governing body deems the estimates of the circuit
court to be unreasonable, the governing body may file a petition for review
with the judicial finance commission on a form provided by the judicial
finance commission after the estimates are included in the county budget. An
amount equal to the difference between the estimates of the circuit court and
the amounts deemed appropriate by the governing body shall be placed in a
separate escrow account, and shall not be appropriated and expended until a
final determination is made by the judicial finance commission under this
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2696 2
subsection. The form provided by the judicial finance commission shall
include an opportunity for the governing body and the circuit court to state
their positions in a summary fashion. If a petition for review is filed, the
circuit court shall have the burden of convincing the judicial finance
commission that the amount estimated by it and included in the budget is
reasonable. In determining if the circuit court estimate is reasonable, the
judicial finance commission shall consider the expenditures necessary to
support the circuit court in relation to the expenditures necessary for the
administration of all other county functions, the actual or estimated operating
deficit or surplus from prior years, all interest and debt redemption charges, all
capital projects expenditures, and the total estimated available revenues from
all sources available for financing the proposed expenditures. In determining
the reasonableness of any budget estimate involving compensation, the
judicial finance commission shall also consider compensation for county
employees with similar duties, length of service and educational qualifications.
The judicial finance commission shall immediately order a settlement
conference to determine if the matter can be resolved before ordering briefs
and oral argument. The judicial finance commission, to the maximum extent
practicable, shall resolve the dispute prior to the beginning of the fiscal year in
question, however, if the dispute is submitted within ninety days of the end of
the fiscal year, the commission shall resolve the dispute within ninety days of
the beginning of the subsequent fiscal year. The county governing body may
file and prosecute a petition for review without representation by counsel.]
[50.641. 1. The estimates of the circuit court referred to in section
50.640 which are to be included within the county budget by the budget
officers and the county commissions without change shall include those
categories of expenditures to support the operations of the circuit court which
are attributable to the business of the circuit judges, associate circuit judges
and the staffs serving such judges. Such estimates shall also include those
categories of expenditures to support the operations of all juvenile officers and
other juvenile court personnel within the circuit that are funded, in whole or in
part, by the county.
2. Nothing contained in section 50.640 shall be construed as providing
for the budgeting of county funds to fund the operation of municipal divisions
of the circuit court.]
[50.642. 1. The presiding judge of each circuit court, or the presiding
judge's designee, shall, not later than fifteen days prior to filing the budget
estimates with the county budget officer as required by section 50.640, meet
with the county commission and budget officer of each county or their
respective designees, and confer and discuss with them the circuit court's
estimates of its requirements for expenditures and its estimates of its revenues
for the next budget year. After the presiding judge and county commissions or
their representatives have met, conferred and discussed the estimates, the
estimates of the circuit court shall be transmitted to the budget officer of each
county in the same manner as provided by section 50.640.

HB 2696 3
2. In all respects other than as provided in subsection 1 of this section,
the budget of the circuit court shall follow the same course and be subject to
the same rights, obligations and processes as otherwise provided by law.]
476.270. All expenditures accruing in the circuit courts, [except salaries and clerk
hire which is payable by the state, except all expenditures accruing in the municipal divisions
of the circuit court, and] except as otherwise provided by law, shall be paid out of the treasury
of the [county in which the court is held] state in the same manner as other demands.
✔